Utah statutes.
78A-2-224.   Bases for certain decisions limited.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), no court may rule on the custody, placement, including foster placement, or other disposition alternative for a minor, or the termination of parental rights, based on the fact that a parent or guardian of the minor lawfully does one or more of the following:

(a)  legally possesses or uses a firearm or other weapon;

(b)  espouses particular religious beliefs; or

(c)  schools the minor or other minors outside the public education system or is otherwise sympathetic to schooling a minor outside the public education system.

(2)  Subsection (1) does not prohibit a ruling based on the compatibility of a minor with a particular custody, placement, or other disposition alternative as determined by the presence of any of the factors in Subsections (1)(a) through (1)(c).

